Washington statutes.
RCW 35.92.190

City may extend water system outside limits—Cannot condemn irrigation system.

No city or town may exercise the power of eminent domain to take or damage any waterworks, storage reservoir, site, pipe line distribution system or any extension thereof, or any water right, water appropriation, dam, canal, plant, or any interest in, or to any of the above used, operated, held, or owned by an irrigation district.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.92.190. Prior: 1933 ex.s. c 17 s 2A; RRS s 9502-2A. Formerly RCW 80.40.190.]

NOTES:

Eminent domain by cities: Chapter 8.12 RCW.